app/utils/MuseScoreWindows/tables/no-no-g2.ctb
# liblouis: Norwegian literary braille, 6-dot, contracted level 2
#
#-name: Norsk litterær punktskrift, 6-punkt, kortskrift nivå 2
#-index-name: Norwegian, contracted, grade 2
#-display-name: Norwegian grade 2 contracted braille
#
#+language:no
#+language:nb
#+language:nn
#+type:literary
#+direction:both
#+dots:6
#+grade:2
#+contraction:partial
#
#  Copyright (C) 2005 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#  Copyright (C) 2009 Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
#-copyright: 2005, ViewPlus Technologies, Inc. www.viewplus.com
#-copyright: 2009, Lars Bjørndal
#-license: LGPLv2.1
#
# Created June 9, 2005 by Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com> with
# help and guidance from Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>.
# Modified Sep 30, 2005 by LU
# Heavily overworked by lars@lamasti.net, 2009.
#
#-author: Leon Ungier <Leon.Ungier@ViewPlus.com>
#-author: Lars Bjørndal <lars@lamasti.net>
#
# Official norwegian braille specifications are collected here:
# http://liblouis.org/braille-specs/norwegian
# This specific table is based on the document "Kortskrift i norsk punktskrift - KS04".
#
# Input is expected to be normalized to NFC (fully composed)
#-unicode-form:nfc
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#

include no-no-g1.ctb

#------------------------------------------------------
# -------------- level 1 contractions -----------------
#------------------------------------------------------
endword ar 3456
word at 1
word ble 12
word de 1456
endword de 1456
word du 145
word eg 1245
word eller 15
word ellers 15-234
word en 126
endword en 126
word ende 126-1456
endword ende 126-1456
word er 156
endword er 156
word et 346
endword et 346
word etter 1356
begword etter 1356
word etterat 1356-1
word ettersom 1356-234
word etterpå 1356-1234

word for 1246											# level 1 contractions
endword for 1246
begword for 1246
word forat 1246-1
word forfra 1246-124
word forover 1246-1346

word forhold 12346
endword forhold 12346
begword forhold 12346

word forholdsvis 12346-1236

word fra 124											# level 1 contractions
word fram 124-134
begword fram 124-134
begword ufram 136-124-134
word før 246
word gjennom 12456
begword gjennom 12456
endword gjennom 12456
endword ugjennom 136-12456
word gjennomfør 12456-246

#word han 125
word hans 125-234
word har 1235
word hun 136
word hvor 2456
begword hvor 2456

word ikke 24-13										# level 1 contractions
word ikkje 24-13-245
word jeg 245
word kan 13
word like 123
word mange 134
word med 146
word mye 13456
word når 1345

word og 14												# level 1 contractions
word også 14-234
word oss 135										
word over 1346
begword over 1346
word overfor 1346-1246
word overpå 1346-1234
word overunder 1346-12345
word overfør 1346-246
word overvære 1346-345
word overvar 1346-3456

word på 1234
word som 234
word til 2345
word under 12345
begword under 12345
word underer 12345-345
word underet 12345-346
word underfra 12345-124
word undersom 12345-234
word undertil 12345-2345

word var 3456
word ved 1236
word være 345											# level 1 contractions

# -------------------------------------------------------------------

# -------------- level 2 contractions -----------------
word aldri 1-24
word alle 1-15
word alles 1-15-234
word allerede 1-123-1235
word alltid 1-2345-145
word altfor 1-1246
word altså 1-16

word andre 1-12356
word andres 1-12356-234
begword andre 1-12356

word annen 1-126
begword annen 1-126
word annens 1-126-234

word annerledes 1-1345-1235
word annet 1-346
begword annet 1-346
word annleis 1-1345-123

endword ar 3456
endword arde 3456-1456
endword ars 3456-234
endword art 3456-2345
endword arte 3456-1256
endword arne 3456-2346

word begge 12-1245
word begges 12-1245-234
word blant 12-123									# level 2 contractions
word blir 12-1235
word blitt 12-2345

word bruk 12-13
begword bruk 12-13
begword ubruk 136-12-13
endword bruk 12-13
endword ubruk 136-12-13

# de                                                            # defined in level 1 contractions
begword de 1456
begword ude 136-1456
endword ude 136-1456
endword des 1456-234
begword des 1456-234

word deg 145-1245									# level 2 contractions
word dem 145-134
word denne 145-2346
word dennes 145-2346-234
word der 23456
word derat 23456-1
word derblant 23456-12-123
word deriblant 23456-24-12-123
word deretter 23456-1356
word derfra 23456-124
word derfør 23456-246
word dergjennom 23456-12456
word derover 23456-1346
word derpå 23456-1234
word dersom 23456-234
word dertil 23456-2345
word derunder 23456-12345
word derved 23456-1236
word deretter 23456-1356

begword der 23456
word dere 145-12356
word deres 145-12356-234
word desse 1456-234
word dessuten 145-234-136
word dessverre 145-234-1236
word dette 145-1256
word dettes 145-1256-234
word din 145-1345
word disse 145-234
word ditt 145-2345
word diverre 145-1236

word dykk 145-13
begword dykk 145-13

word eg 1245											# level 2 contractions

# en															# defined in level 1
word ens 126-234									# level 2 contractions
endword ens 126-234
endword ent 126-2345
endword enne 126-2346
endword ende 126-1456
endword ente 126-1256

word enda 15-1
word ende 126-1456
word endes 126-1456-234
word enno 15-135
word ennå 15-16

# er															# defined in level 1
endword ers 156-234								# level 2 contractions
endword ert 156-2345
endword erne 156-2346
endword erde 156-1456
endword erte 156-1256

# et
word ett 346-2345															
endword ets 346-234								# level 2 contractions
endword ett 346-2345
endword etne 346-2346
endword ette 346-1256

# word etter 1356									# defined in level 1
begword uetter 136-1356
word ettergjorde 1356-1245-245-1456
word ettergikk 1356-1245-13

word felles 124-123-234
begword felles 124-123-234
word fikk 124-13

# word for 1246										# defined in level 1
begword ufor 136-1246
endword ufor 136-1246

# forhold 12346                                     # defined in level 1
word forhold 12346
begword uforhold 136-12346
endword uforhold 136-12346
word forholda 12346-1
endword forholda 12346-1
begword forholda 12346-1
word forholdene 12346-15-2346
endword forholdene 12346-15-2346
begword forholdene 12346-15-2346
word forholdet 12346-346
endword forholdet 12346-346
begword forholdet 12346-346

# word forholdsvis 12346-1236	# defined in level 1

word forskjell 1246-14
endword forskjell 1246-14
begword forskjell 1246-14
word forskjellane 1246-14-1-2346
endword forskjellane 1246-14-1-2346
begword forskjellane 1246-14-1-2346
word forskjellene 1246-14-15-2346
begword forskjellene 1246-14-15-2346
endword forskjellene 1246-14-15-2346
word forskjellen 1246-14-126
endword forskjellen 1246-14-126
begword forskjellen 1246-14-126
word forskjeller 1246-14-156
begword forskjeller 1246-14-156
endword forskjeller 1246-14-156
word forskjellar 1246-14-3456
endword forskjellar 1246-14-3456
begword forskjellar 1246-14-3456

# word fra 124												# defined in level 1

word fulgt 124-1245-2345
word fulgte 124-1245-1256
word følg 124-1245
begword følg 124-1245
word følger 124-1245-156
word følgers 124-1245-156-234
word følgerne 124-1245-156-1246
word følgernes 124-1245-156-1246-234

word følge 124-1245-15
begword følge 124-1245-15
endword følge 124-1245-15
word følgende 124-1245-126-1456
begword følgende 124-1245-126-1456

word først 124-234-2345
begword først 124-234-2345
word første 124-234-1256
begword første 124-234-1256
word fått 124-2345

word gang 1245-1245								# level 2 contractions
begword gang 1245-1245
word gikk 1245-13
word gjekk 1245-245-13

# word gjennom 12456
begword ugjennom 136-12456
word gjennomgang 12456-1245-1245
word gjennomgikk 12456-1245-13

word gjorde 1245-245-1456
endword gjorde 1245-245-1456
word gjort 1245-245-2345
endword gjort 1245-245-2345
word gjør 1245-245

word hadde 125-1456								# level 2 contractions
# word han 125
# word hans 125-234
# word har 1235										# already in level 1
word hatt 125-2345
word hennar 15-3456
word henne 15-15
word hennes 15-15-234
word heller 125-123-156
word helst 125-123
# word hun 136										# already in level 1
word hverandre 2456-1-12356
word hverandres 2456-1-12356-234
word hvilke 2456-13
word hvilken 2456-13-126
word hvilket 2456-13-346
word hvis 2456-234
word hvordan 2456-145
word hvoretter 2456-1356
word hvorfra 2456-124
word hvorledes 2456-123
word hvorpå 2456-1234
word hvorved 2456-1236


word iallfall 24-1-124						# level 2 contractions
word iblant 24-12-123
# word ikke 24-13									# already in level 1
word imidlertid 24-24
word inga 24-1

word ingen 24-15
word ingens 24-15-234
begword ingen 24-15

word ingenting 24-15-2345
word innenfor 24-1246
word innenfra 24-124

word kanskje 13-13								# level 2 contractions
word komme 13-134
word kommer 13-134-156
word kommet 13-134-346
word korleis 13-234
word kunne 13-1345
word kunnet 13-1345-346
word kvarandre 1-1-12356
word kvarandres 1-1-12356-234
word kvifor 13-1246

word likedan 123-145							# level 2 contractions
word likesom 123-234
word liketil 123-2345
word likevel 123-123
word liksom 123-13-234

# word mange 134									# defined in level 1
word manges 134-234
# word med 146										# defined in level 1
endword med 146
begword med 146
endword umed 136-146
begword umed 136-146

word meg 134-1245									# level 2 contractions
word meget 134-346
word mellom 134-123
endword mellom 134-123
begword mellom 134-123
word min 134-1345
word mitt 134-2345
word mye 13456
word mykje 134-13
word måtta 134-2345-1
word måtte 134-1256
word måttet 134-2345-346

word natur 1345-2345
begword natur 1345-2345
word unatur 136-1345-2345
begword unatur 136-1345-2345

word ne 2346
word nes 2346-234
endword ne 2346
endword nes 2346-234

word nedenfor 1345-1246						# level 2 contractions
word nedenfra 1345-124
word neppe 1345-1234
word noen 1345-1345
begword noen 1345-1345

word nødvendig 1345-1236
begword nødvendig 1345-1236
word unødvendig 136-1345-1236
begword unødvendig 136-1345-1236

word noko 1345-13
word nokon 1345-13-1345
word nokre 1345-13-12356
# word når 1345

# word og 14											# defined in level 1
# word også												# defined in level 1
# word oss												# defined in level 1
word ovenfor 135-1246
word ovenfra 135-124

# word over 1346								  # defined in level 1
word overgikk 1346-1245-13
word overgang 1346-1245-1245
word overs 1346-234
begword uover 136-1346

begword overgang 1346-1245-1245

word punkt 1234-13-2345
begword punkt 1234-13-2345
endword punkt 1234-13-2345
# word på 1234										# defined in level 1

word re 12356
word res 12356-234
endword re 12356
endword res 12356-234

word samme 234-134								# level 2 contractions

word sammen 234-134-126
begword usammen 136-234-134-126
begword sammen 234-134-126

word seg 234-1245
word selv 234-1236
word sin 234-1345
word sitt 234-2345
word sjøl 234-245

word sjølv 234-245-1236
word sjølve 234-245-1236-15
begword sjølv 234-245-1236
begword usjølv 136-234-245-1236

word skal 123456									# level 2 contractions
word skulla 123456-1
word skulle 123456-15
word skullet 123456-346
word snart 234-1235
word spørsmål 234-1234-134
begword spørsmål 234-1234-134
endword spørsmål 234-1234-134

word takk 2345-13									# level 2 contractions
begword utakk 136-2345-13
begword takk 2345-13

word tatt 2345-2345

word te 1256
endword te 1256
endword tes 1256-234

word tilbake 2345-12
begword tilbake 2345-12
word tilfeldig 2345-124-1245
begword tilfeldig 2345-124-1245
